Idaho, session 2025, H0238.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-143, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-143. DISPLAY OF THE TEN COMMANDMENTS. (1) For the purposes of this
section "educational institution" means an educational institution under
the general supervision, governance, or control of the state board of educa-
tion or the board of regents of the university of Idaho and any other school
located in the state of Idaho that receives public funds from the state of
Idaho.
(2) An educational institution shall display a durable poster or a
framed copy of a representation of the ten commandments that meets the re-
quirements of subsection (3) of this section in a conspicuous location in the
educational institution.
(3) A poster or framed copy of the ten commandments required by the pro-
visions of subsection (2) of this section shall:
(a) Be at least sixteen (16) inches wide and twenty (20) inches tall;
and
(b) Include in a size and typeface that is legible the text of the ten
commandments to read as follows:
The Ten Commandments:
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon
the land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant,
nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy
neighbor's.


(4) An educational institution that does not display a durable poster
or a framed copy of the ten commandments as required by subsection (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Accept any offer of a privately donated durable poster or framed
copy of the ten commandments if the poster or copy:
(i) Meets the requirements of the provisions of subsection (3) of
this section; and
(ii) Does not contain any additional content; and
(b) Display the poster or framed copy as specified in subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) If an educational institution has in its possession a poster or
framed copy of the ten commandments that does not meet the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section, the institution may replace the posters or
copies with posters or copies that meet the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section by accepting a private donation. If an educational insti-
tution receives additional donated ten commandments displays pursuant to
this subsection, it shall display such additional ten commandments displays
in conspicuous places in the classrooms of the educational institution.
If all classrooms of an educational institution contain ten commandments
displays that meet the requirements of section (3) and this section, and an
educational institution has in its possession additional ten commandments
displays that are not needed, it may offer such displays as a donation to
other educational institutions.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.